Tennessee, session 114, SB0979.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 16, Part 5, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "First responder" means a law enforcement officer, corrections officer,
firefighter, emergency medical technician, or other emergency service personnel;
and
(2) "Harass" means to knowingly engage in a course of conduct directed
at a first responder that intentionally causes the first responder to feel substantial
emotional distress and serves no legitimate purpose.
(b) It is an offense for a person, after receiving a verbal warning not to approach
from an individual, who the person knows or reasonably should know is a first responder
and who is engaged in the lawful performance of the first responder's official duties, to
knowingly violate the warning and approach or remain within twenty-five feet (25') of the
first responder with the intent to:
(1) Impede or interfere with the first responder's ability to perform the first
responder's official duties;
(2) Threaten the first responder with physical harm; or
(3) Harass the first responder.
(c) A person who violates this section commits a Class B misdemeanor.
SB0979
001228
- 1 -

SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001228